Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.029

Property purchase and disposition—Independent purchasing authority—Purchase of correctional industries products.

(1)(a) An institution of higher education may, consistent with RCW 28B.10.925 and 28B.10.926, exercise independently those powers otherwise granted to the director of enterprise services in chapters 43.19 and 39.26 RCW in connection with the purchase and disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of higher education.

(b) Property disposition policies followed by institutions of higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the department of enterprise services.

(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection and elsewhere as provided by law, purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.26, and 43.03 RCW, and RCW 43.19.1917, 43.19.685, and 43.19.560 through 43.19.637.

(ii) Institutions of higher education may use all appropriate means for making and paying for travel arrangements including, but not limited to, electronic booking and reservations, advance payment and deposits for tours, lodging, and other necessary expenses, and other travel transactions based on standard industry practices and federal accountable plan requirements. Such arrangements shall support student, faculty, staff, and other participants' travel, by groups and individuals, both domestic and international, in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible, regardless of the source of funds.

(iii) Formal sealed, electronic, or web-based competitive bidding is not necessary for purchases or personal services contracts by institutions of higher education for less than one hundred thousand dollars. However, for purchases and personal services contracts of ten thousand dollars or more and less than one hundred thousand dollars, quotations must be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone, electronic, or written quotations, or any combination thereof. As part of securing the three vendor quotations, institutions of higher education must invite at least one quotation each from a certified minority and a certified woman-owned vendor that otherwise qualifies to perform the work. A record of competition for all such purchases and personal services contracts of ten thousand dollars or more and less than one hundred thousand dollars must be documented for audit purposes.

(d) Purchases under chapter 39.26, 43.19, or 43.105 RCW by institutions of higher education may be made by using contracts for materials, supplies, services, or equipment negotiated or entered into by, for, or through group purchasing organizations.

(e) The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW 43.19.450.

(f) Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher education shall comply with RCW 43.19.769, 43.19.763, and 43.19.781.

(g) If an institution of higher education can satisfactorily demonstrate to the director of the office of financial management that the cost of compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW 43.19.685 and 43.19.637.

(h) When any institution of higher education exercises its independent purchasing authority for a commodity or group of commodities, the director of enterprise services shall not be required to provide those services for that institution for the duration of the enterprise services contract term for that commodity or group of commodities.

(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with correctional industries, to:

(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service, and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state dollars;

(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products from which higher education shall purchase; and

(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build correctional industries' business with institutions of higher education.

(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to increase higher education purchases of correctional industries products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. The plan shall include the correctional industries' production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30, 2005.

(4)(a) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of corrections.

(b) Institutions of higher education shall endeavor to assure the department of corrections has notifications of bid opportunities with the goal of meeting or exceeding the purchasing target in (a) of this subsection.

[ 2016 c 197 s 1; 2015 c 79 s 1; 2013 c 291 s 27; 2012 c 230 s 4. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 303; 2011 c 198 s 1; 2010 c 61 s 1; 2004 c 167 s 10; prior: 1998 c 344 s 5; 1998 c 111 s 2; 1996 c 110 s 5; 1993 c 379 s 101.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Findings—1998 c 344: "It is the intent of the legislature to provide the necessary access to quality upper-division and graduate higher education opportunities for the citizens of Spokane. The legislature intends that the Spokane branch campus of Washington State University, offering upper-division and graduate programs, be located at the Riverpoint Higher Education Park and that Washington State University be the administrative and fiscal agent for the Riverpoint Higher Education Park. In addition, those programs offered by Eastern Washington University that meet the rules and guidelines established by the higher education coordinating board's program approval process may serve students at the Riverpoint Higher Education Park. The legislature intends to streamline the program planning and approval process in Spokane by eliminating the joint center for higher education; thereby treating the Spokane higher education community like other public higher education communities in Washington that receive program approval from the higher education coordinating board. However, the legislature encourages partnerships, collaboration, and avoidance of program duplication through regular communication among the presidents of Spokane's public and private institutions of higher education. The legislature further intends that the residential mission of Eastern Washington University in Cheney be strengthened and that Eastern Washington University focus on the excellence of its primary campus in Cheney.

In addition, the legislature finds that the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute is a vital and necessary element in the academic and economic future of eastern Washington. The legislature also finds that it is in the interest of the state of Washington to support and promote applied research and technology in areas of the state that, because of geographic or historic circumstances, have not developed fully balanced economies. It is the intent of the legislature that institutions of higher education and the *department of community, trade, and economic development work cooperatively with the private sector in the development and implementation of a technology transfer and integration program to promote the economic development and enhance the quality of life in eastern Washington." [ 1998 c 344 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.

Intent—1993 c 379: "The legislature acknowledges the academic freedom of institutions of higher education, and seeks to improve their efficiency and effectiveness in carrying out their missions. By this act, the legislature intends to increase the flexibility of institutions of higher education to manage personnel, construction, purchasing, printing, and tuition." [ 1993 c 379 s 1.]

Severability—1993 c 379: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 c 379 s 407.]

Effective date—1993 c 379: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 379 s 408.]